Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5258.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 182. (1) The governor as commander-in-chief may prescribe the award of medals and other suitable means of public recognition for distinguished service, longevity, acts of valor, or meritorious achievement. The awards may be made to members of the organized militia of this state or to other individuals, who are not members of the organized militia, who have rendered appropriate service to the military establishment. The adjutant general shall develop and publish rules to carry out this subsection. (2) The adjutant general is authorized to award the "Michigan Vietnam veteran recognition certificate". The adjutant general, in consultation with the director of the Michigan veterans affairs agency, shall develop and publish rules to carry out this subsection. All of the following apply to the certificate: (a) An individual may be awarded the certificate if the individual meets all of the following requirements: (i) The individual is a citizen of this state or was a citizen of this state while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States. (ii) The individual was honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances. (iii) The individual served during the Vietnam War era. (b) The certificate created under this subsection also includes the option of a special designation, as developed by the department of military and veterans affairs, recognizing individuals who were exposed to dioxin or phenoxy herbicides during their service. To receive this designation, an individual must demonstrate in a form and manner prescribed by the department of military and veterans affairs that while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States, he or she the individual was exposed to dioxin or phenoxy herbicides, as evidenced by a medical diagnosis of a disease associated with dioxin or phenoxy herbicides and any other proof required by the adjutant general. (c) An individual shall not be awarded more than 1 certificate. (d) If the certificate recipient is deceased, the certificate may be presented to a designated representative of the deceased. (3) The adjutant general is authorized to award an "Iraq and Afghanistan veteran recognition certificate". The adjutant general, in consultation with the director of the Michigan veterans affairs agency, shall develop and publish rules to carry out this subsection. All of the following apply to the certificate: (a) An individual may be awarded the certificate if the individual meets all of the following requirements: (i) The individual is a citizen of this state or was a citizen of this state while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States. (ii) The individual was honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances. (iii) The individual served in Iraq or Afghanistan during a period of conflict. (b) An individual shall not be awarded more than 1 certificate. (c) If the certificate recipient is deceased, the certificate may be presented to a designated representative of the deceased. (4) (3) As used in this section: (a) "Armed Forces of the United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Space Force, or Coast Guard, including the Michigan National Guard and reserve components. (b) "Certificate" means the Michigan Vietnam veteran recognition certificate. (c) "Vietnam War era" means the period beginning on February 28, 1961 and ending on May 7, 1975.